Hawaii statutes.
§414D-201 Merger. (a) Pursuant to a
plan of merger approved as provided in section 414D–202, a domestic or foreign
corporation may merge with one or more domestic professional corporations, or
with one or more associations, one or more corporations, or other business
entities organized under the laws of this State, any state or territory of the
United States, any foreign jurisdiction, or any combination thereof, with one
of the domestic professional corporations, associations, domestic or foreign
corporations, or other business entities whether domestic or foreign, being the
surviving entity as provided in the plan; provided that the merger is permitted
by the law of the state or country under whose law each foreign corporation
that is a party to the merger is organized.

(b) The plan of merger shall set forth:

(1) The name and jurisdiction of formation or
organization of each entity that is a party to the merger, and the name of the
surviving entity into which each plans to merge;

(2) The terms and conditions of the merger;

(3) The manner and basis for converting memberships
of each merging corporation into memberships, obligations, or securities of the
surviving entity or into cash or other property in whole or part;

(4) The street address of the surviving entity's
principal place of business, or if no street address is available, the rural
post office number or post office box designated or made available by the
United States Postal Service; and

(5) Amendments, if any, to the organizing articles of
the surviving entity or, if no amendments are desired, a statement that the
organizing articles of the surviving entity shall not be amended pursuant to
the merger.

(c) A plan of merger may set forth other
provisions relating to the merger.

(d) If a foreign corporation survives a
merger, it shall not do business in this State until an application for a
certificate of authority is filed with the department director if the foreign
corporation is not already authorized to do business in the State.

(e) The surviving entity shall furnish a copy
of the plan of merger, on request and without cost, to any member or
shareholder of any entity that is a party to the merger. [L 2001, c 105, pt of
§1; am L 2002, c 41, §13; am L 2004, c 121, §16]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next